District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.13

Information booklet.

The Committee shall publish an informational booklet describing the Program for the public. The booklet shall be updated as may be necessary.

History

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 14, 48 DCR 2036